test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-uptoten_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Numeral - ohtâ:
    ohtâ+Num+Sg+Nom: ohtâ
    ohtâ+Num+Sg+Gen: oovtâ
    ohtâ+Num+Sg+Acc: oovtâ
    ohtâ+Num+Sg+Ill: oohtân
    ohtâ+Num+Sg+Loc: oovtâst
    ohtâ+Num+Sg+Com: ovttáin
    ohtâ+Num+Sg+Abe: ovtâttáá
    ohtâ+Num+Ess: ohtân    # ohtâ+Num+Par: no partitive with nr 1
    ohtâ+Num+Pl+Nom: oovtah
    ohtâ+Num+Pl+Gen: [oovtâi, ovtâi]
    ohtâ+Num+Pl+Acc: oovtâid
    ohtâ+Num+Pl+Ill: ovttáid
    ohtâ+Num+Pl+Loc: oovtâin
    ohtâ+Num+Pl+Com: ovtâiguin
    ohtâ+Num+Pl+Abe: ovtâittáá

# ohtâ as num attr.
# ohtâ+Num+Sg+Nom: ohtâ kiistâ
# ohtâ+Num+Sg+Gen: oovtâ kistuu
# ohtâ+Num+Sg+Acc: oovtâ kistuu
# ohtâ+Num+Sg+Ill: oovtâ kistui
# ohtâ+Num+Sg+Loc: oovtâ kistust
# ohtâ+Num+Sg+Com: ovttáin kistuin
# ohtâ+Num+Sg+Abe: oovtâ kistuuttáá
# ohtâ+Num+Ess: ohtân kiistân
# No partitive with nr 1
# ohtâ+Num+Pl+Nom: oovtah kistuuh
# ohtâ+Num+Pl+Gen: oovtâi kistui
# ohtâ+Num+Pl+Acc: oovtâid kistuid
# ohtâ+Num+Pl+Ill: oovttáid kistuid
# ohtâ+Num+Pl+Loc: oovtâin kistuin
# ohtâ+Num+Pl+Com: oovtâi kistuiguin
# ohtâ+Num+Pl+Abe: oovtâi kistuittáá
  
  Noun - kyehti:
    kyehti+Num+Sg+Nom: kyehti
    kyehti+Num+Sg+Gen: kyevti
    kyehti+Num+Sg+Acc: kyehti # From 2 -> like nominative
    kyehti+Num+Sg+Ill: kuáhtán
    kyehti+Num+Sg+Loc: kyevtist
    kyehti+Num+Sg+Com: kuovttijn
    kyehti+Num+Sg+Abe: kyevtittáá
    kyehti+Num+Ess: kyehtin   # No partitive with nr 2
    kyehti+Num+Pl+Nom: kyevtih
    kyehti+Num+Pl+Gen: kuovtij
    kyehti+Num+Pl+Acc: kuovtijd
    kyehti+Num+Pl+Ill: kuovttijd
    kyehti+Num+Pl+Loc: kuovtijn
    kyehti+Num+Pl+Com: kuovtijguin
    kyehti+Num+Pl+Abe: kuovtijttáá


# kyehti as num attr.
# kyehti+Num+Sg+Nom: kyehti kistuu
# kyehti+Num+Sg+Gen: kyevti kistuu
# kyehti+Num+Sg+Acc: kyehti kistuu
# kyehti+Num+Sg+Ill: kyevti kistui
# kyehti+Num+Sg+Loc: kyevti kistust
# kyehti+Num+Sg+Com: kuovttijn kistuin
# kyehti+Num+Sg+Abe: kyevti kistuuttáá
# kyehti+Num+Ess: kyehtin kiistân
# No partitive with nr 2
# kyehti+Num+Pl+Nom: kyevtih kistuuh
# kyehti+Num+Pl+Gen: kuovtij kistui
# kyehti+Num+Pl+Acc: kuovtijd kistuid
# kyehti+Num+Pl+Ill: kuovttijd kistuid
# kyehti+Num+Pl+Loc: kuovtijn kistuin
# kyehti+Num+Pl+Com: kuovtij kistuiguin
# kyehti+Num+Pl+Abe: kuovtij kistuittáá

  Noun - kulmâ: 
    kulmâ+Num+Sg+Nom: kulmâ
    kulmâ+Num+Sg+Gen: kuulmâ
    kulmâ+Num+Sg+Acc: kulmâ
    kulmâ+Num+Sg+Ill: kuulmân
    kulmâ+Num+Sg+Loc: kuulmâst
    kulmâ+Num+Sg+Com: kulmáin
    kulmâ+Num+Sg+Abe: kulmâttáá
    kulmâ+Num+Ess: kulmân    # No partitive with nr 3
    kulmâ+Num+Pl+Nom: kuulmah
    kulmâ+Num+Pl+Gen: [kuulmâi, kulmâi]
    kulmâ+Num+Pl+Acc: kuulmâid
    kulmâ+Num+Pl+Ill: kulmáid
    kulmâ+Num+Pl+Loc: kuulmâin
    kulmâ+Num+Pl+Com: kulmâiguin
    kulmâ+Num+Pl+Abe: kulmâittáá

# kulmâ as num attr.
# kulmâ+Num+Sg+Nom: kulmâ kistuu
# kulmâ+Num+Sg+Gen: kuulmâ kistuu
# kulmâ+Num+Sg+Acc: kulmâ kistuu
# kulmâ+Num+Sg+Ill: kuulmâ kistui
# kulmâ+Num+Sg+Loc: kuulmâ kistust
# kulmâ+Num+Sg+Com: kulmáin kistuin
# kulmâ+Num+Sg+Abe: kuulmâ kistuuttáá
# kulmâ+Num+Ess: kulmân kiistân
# No partitive with nr 3
# kulmâ+Num+Pl+Nom: kuulmah kistuuh
# kulmâ+Num+Pl+Gen: [kuulmâi kistui, kuulmâi kistui]
# kulmâ+Num+Pl+Acc: kuulmâid kistuid
# kulmâ+Num+Pl+Ill: kulmáid kistuid
# kulmâ+Num+Pl+Loc: kuulmâin kistuin
# kulmâ+Num+Pl+Com: [kuulmâi kistuiguin, kulmâi kistuiguin]
# kulmâ+Num+Pl+Abe: [kuulmâi kistuittáá, kulmâi kistuittáá]

  Noun - nelji: 
    nelji+Num+Sg+Nom: nelji
    nelji+Num+Sg+Gen: neelji
    nelji+Num+Sg+Acc: nelji
    nelji+Num+Sg+Ill: niälján
    nelji+Num+Sg+Loc: neeljist
    nelji+Num+Sg+Com: neljijn
    nelji+Num+Sg+Abe: neljittáá
    nelji+Num+Ess: neljin    # No partitive with nr 4
    nelji+Num+Pl+Nom: neeljih
    nelji+Num+Pl+Gen: [neeljij, neljij]
    nelji+Num+Pl+Acc: neeljijd
    nelji+Num+Pl+Ill: neljijd
    nelji+Num+Pl+Loc: neeljijn
    nelji+Num+Pl+Com: neljijguin
    nelji+Num+Pl+Abe: neljijttáá

# nelji as num attr.
# nelji+Num+Sg+Nom: nelji kistuu
# nelji+Num+Sg+Gen: neelji kistuu
# nelji+Num+Sg+Acc: nelji kistuu
# nelji+Num+Sg+Ill: neelji kistui
# nelji+Num+Sg+Loc: neelji kistust
# nelji+Num+Sg+Com: neljijn kistuin
# nelji+Num+Sg+Abe: neelji kistuuttáá
# nelji+Num+Ess: neljin kiistân
# No partitive with nr 4
# nelji+Num+Pl+Nom: neeljih kistuuh
# nelji+Num+Pl+Gen: [neeljij kistui, neljij kistui]
# nelji+Num+Pl+Acc: neeljijd kistuid
# nelji+Num+Pl+Ill: neeljijd kistuid
# nelji+Num+Pl+Loc: neeljijn kistuin
# nelji+Num+Pl+Com: [neeljij kistuiguin, neljij kistuiguin]
# nelji+Num+Pl+Abe: [neeljij kistuittáá, neljij kistuittáá]

  Noun - vittâ: 
    vittâ+Num+Sg+Nom: vittâ
    vittâ+Num+Sg+Gen: viiđâ
    vittâ+Num+Sg+Acc: viiđâ
    vittâ+Num+Sg+Ill: viitân
    vittâ+Num+Sg+Loc: viiđâst
    vittâ+Num+Sg+Com: viiđáin
    vittâ+Num+Sg+Abe: viđâttáá
    vittâ+Num+Ess: vittân    # No partitive with nr 5
    vittâ+Num+Pl+Nom: viiđah
    vittâ+Num+Pl+Gen: [viiđâi, viđâi]
    vittâ+Num+Pl+Acc: viiđâid
    vittâ+Num+Pl+Ill: viiđáid
    vittâ+Num+Pl+Loc: viiđâin
    vittâ+Num+Pl+Com: viđâiguin
    vittâ+Num+Pl+Abe: viđâittáá

# vittâ as num attr.
# vittâ+Num+Sg+Nom: vittâ kistuu
# vittâ+Num+Sg+Gen: viiđâ kistuu
# vittâ+Num+Sg+Acc: vittâ kistuu
# vittâ+Num+Sg+Ill: viiđâ kistui
# vittâ+Num+Sg+Loc: viiđâ kistust
# vittâ+Num+Sg+Com: viiđáin kistuin
# vittâ+Num+Sg+Abe: viiđâ kistuuttáá
# vittâ+Num+Ess: vittân kiistân
# No partitive with nr 5
# vittâ+Num+Pl+Nom: viiđah kistuuh
# vittâ+Num+Pl+Gen: [viiđâi kistui, viđâi kistui]
# vittâ+Num+Pl+Acc: viiđâid kistuid
# vittâ+Num+Pl+Ill: viiđáid kistuid
# vittâ+Num+Pl+Loc: viiđâin kistuin
# vittâ+Num+Pl+Com: [viiđâi kistuiguin, viđâi kistuiguin]
# vittâ+Num+Pl+Abe: [viiđâi kistuittáá, viđâi kistuittáá]

#  Noun - kuttâ: # Inflection like in nr 5

  Noun - čiččâm:
    čiččâm+Num+Sg+Nom: čiččâm
    čiččâm+Num+Sg+Gen: čiččâm
    čiččâm+Num+Sg+Acc: čiččâm
    čiččâm+Num+Sg+Ill: čiččâmân
    čiččâm+Num+Sg+Loc: čiččâmist
    čiččâm+Num+Sg+Com: čiččâmáin
    čiččâm+Num+Sg+Abe: čiččâmttáá
    čiččâm+Num+Ess: čiččâmin # No partitive with nr 7
    čiččâm+Num+Pl+Nom: čiččâmeh
    čiččâm+Num+Pl+Gen: čiččâmij
    čiččâm+Num+Pl+Acc: čiččâmijd
    čiččâm+Num+Pl+Ill: čiččâmáid
    čiččâm+Num+Pl+Loc: čiččâmáin
    čiččâm+Num+Pl+Com: čiččâmijguin
    čiččâm+Num+Pl+Abe: čiččâmijttáá

# čiččâm as num attr.
# No nominative; see Partitive with nr 7
# čiččâm+Num+Sg+Gen: čiččâm kistuu
# čiččâm+Num+Sg+Acc: čiččâm kistuu
# čiččâm+Num+Sg+Ill: čiččâm kistui
# čiččâm+Num+Sg+Loc: čiččâm kistust
# čiččâm+Num+Sg+Com: čiččâmáin kistuin
# čiččâm+Num+Sg+Abe: čiččâm kistuuttáá
# čiččâm+Num+Ess: čiččâm kiistân
# čiččâm+Num+Par: čiččâm kiistâd
# čiččâm+Num+Pl+Nom: čiččâmeh kistuuh
# čiččâm+Num+Pl+Gen: čiččâmij kistui
# čiččâm+Num+Pl+Acc: čiččâmijd kistuid
# čiččâm+Num+Pl+Ill: čiččâmáid kistuid
# čiččâm+Num+Pl+Loc: čiččâmijn kistuin
# čiččâm+Num+Pl+Com: čiččâmij kistuiguin
# čiččâm+Num+Pl+Abe: čiččâmij kistuittáá

  Noun - käävci:
    käävci+Num+Sg+Nom: käävci
    käävci+Num+Sg+Gen: käävci
    käävci+Num+Sg+Acc: käävci
    käävci+Num+Sg+Ill: káávcán
    käävci+Num+Sg+Loc: käävcist
    käävci+Num+Sg+Com: kavccijn
    käävci+Num+Sg+Abe: kävcittáá
    käävci+Num+Ess: käävcin # No partitive with nr 7
    käävci+Num+Pl+Nom: käävcih
    käävci+Num+Pl+Gen: [kaavcij, kavcij]
    käävci+Num+Pl+Acc: kaavcijd
    käävci+Num+Pl+Ill: kavccijd
    käävci+Num+Pl+Loc: kaavcijn
    käävci+Num+Pl+Com: kavcijguin
    käävci+Num+Pl+Abe: kavcijttáá

# käävci as num attr.
# No nominative; see Partitive with nr 8
# käävci+Num+Sg+Gen: käävci kistuu
# käävci+Num+Sg+Acc: käävci kistuu
# käävci+Num+Sg+Ill: käävci kistui
# käävci+Num+Sg+Loc: käävci kistust
# käävci+Num+Sg+Com: kavccijn kistuin
# käävci+Num+Sg+Abe: käävci kistuuttáá
# käävci+Num+Ess: käävcin kiistân
# käävci+Num+Par: käävci kiistâd
# käävci+Num+Pl+Nom: käävcih kistuuh
# käävci+Num+Pl+Gen: [kaavcij kistui, kavcij kistui]
# käävci+Num+Pl+Acc: kaavcijd kistuid
# käävci+Num+Pl+Ill: kavccijd kistuid
# käävci+Num+Pl+Loc: kaavcijn kistuin
# käävci+Num+Pl+Com: [kaavcij kistuiguin, kavcij kistuiguin]
# käävci+Num+Pl+Abe: [kaavcij kistuittáá, kavcij kistuittáá]

  Noun - oovce:
    oovce+Num+Sg+Nom: oovce
    oovce+Num+Sg+Gen: oovce
    oovce+Num+Sg+Acc: oovce
    oovce+Num+Sg+Ill: oovcán
    oovce+Num+Sg+Loc: oovcest
    oovce+Num+Sg+Com: ovccijn
    oovce+Num+Sg+Abe: ovcettáá
    oovce+Num+Ess: oovcen # No partitive with nr 9
    oovce+Num+Pl+Nom: oovceh
    oovce+Num+Pl+Gen: [oovcij, ovcij]
    oovce+Num+Pl+Acc: oovcijd
    oovce+Num+Pl+Ill: ovccijd
    oovce+Num+Pl+Loc: oovcijn
    oovce+Num+Pl+Com: ovcijguin
    oovce+Num+Pl+Abe: ovcijttáá

# oovce as num attr.
# No nominative; see Partitive with nr 8
# oovce+Num+Sg+Gen: oovce kistuu
# oovce+Num+Sg+Acc: oovce kistuu
# oovce+Num+Sg+Ill: oovce kistui
# oovce+Num+Sg+Loc: oovce kistust
# oovce+Num+Sg+Com: ovccijn kistuin
# oovce+Num+Sg+Abe: oovce kistuuttáá
# oovce+Num+Ess: oovcen kiistân
# oovce+Num+Par: oovce kiistâd
# oovce+Num+Pl+Nom: oovceh kistuuh
# oovce+Num+Pl+Gen: [oovcij kistui, ovcij kistui]
# oovce+Num+Pl+Acc: oovcijd kistuid
# oovce+Num+Pl+Ill: ovccijd kistuid
# oovce+Num+Pl+Loc: oovcijn kistuin
# oovce+Num+Pl+Com: [oovcij kistuiguin, ovcij kistuiguin]
# oovce+Num+Pl+Abe: [oovcij kistuittáá, ovcij kistuittáá]

  Noun - love:
    love+Num+Sg+Nom: love
    love+Num+Sg+Gen: love
    love+Num+Sg+Acc: love
    love+Num+Sg+Ill: lohán
    love+Num+Sg+Loc: lovveest
    love+Num+Sg+Com: luvvijn
    love+Num+Sg+Abe: lovettáá
    love+Num+Ess: lovveen # No partitive with 10
    love+Num+Pl+Nom: loveh
    love+Num+Pl+Gen: [luuvij, luvij]
    love+Num+Pl+Acc: luuvijd
    love+Num+Pl+Ill: luvvijd
    love+Num+Pl+Loc: luuvijn
    love+Num+Pl+Com: luvijguin
    love+Num+Pl+Abe: luvijttáá

# love as num attr.
# No nominative; see Partitive with nr 8
# oovce+Num+Sg+Gen: love kistuu
# oovce+Num+Sg+Acc: love kistuu
# oovce+Num+Sg+Ill: love kistui
# oovce+Num+Sg+Loc: love kistust
# oovce+Num+Sg+Com: luvvijn kistuin
# oovce+Num+Sg+Abe: love kistuuttáá
# oovce+Num+Ess: lovveen kiistân
# oovce+Num+Par: love kiistâd
# oovce+Num+Pl+Nom: loveh kistuuh
# oovce+Num+Pl+Gen: [luuvij kistui, luvij kistui]
# oovce+Num+Pl+Acc: luuvijd kistuid
# oovce+Num+Pl+Ill: luvvijd kistuid
# oovce+Num+Pl+Loc: luuvijn kistuin
# oovce+Num+Pl+Com: [luuvij kistuiguin, luvij kistuiguin]
# oovce+Num+Pl+Abe: [luuvij kistuittáá, luvij kistuittáá]
